Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-103
Civil officers; commissions; issuance by Governor.

All commissions to civil officers in this state shall be issued and signed by the Governor, and countersigned by the Secretary of State, and a record thereof kept in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1867, § 3, p. 101;

R.S.1913, § 5533;

C.S.1922, § 4829;

C.S.1929, § 84-104;

R.S.1943, § 84-103.